en: Store only in the original container in a cool well-ventilated place away from cellulose, S3/9/14/49.6
de: Nur im Originalbehälter an einem kühlen\, gut gelüfteten Ort\, entfernt von Cellulose aufbewahren, S3/9/14/49.6
dk: Må kun opbevares i originalemballagen på et køligt\, godt ventileret sted og på afstand fra cellulose, S3/9/14/49.6
es: Consérvese únicamente en el recipiente de origen\, en lugar fresco y bien ventilado y lejos de celulosa, S3/9/14/49.6
fi: Säilytettävä alkuperäispakkauksessa viileässä paikassa\, jossa on hyvä ilmanvaihto\, erillään selluloosasta, S3/9/14/49.6
fr: Conserver uniquement dans le récipient d'origine dans un endroit frais\, bien aéré et éloigné de la cellulose, S3/9/14/49.6
it: Conservare soltanto nel contenitore originale in luogo fresco\, ben ventilato\, lontano da cellulosa, S3/9/14/49.6
nl: Uitsluitend in het originele reservoir op een koele\, goed geventileerde plaats\, ontdaan van cellulose bewaren, S3/9/14/49.6
no: Må kun oppbevares i original emballasjen på et kjølig\, godt ventilert sted adskilt fra sellulose, S3/9/14/49.6
pt: Conservar unicamente no recipiente de origem em lugar fresco e bem ventilado ao abrigo de celulose, S3/9/14/49.6
sv: Förvaras i den ursprungliga förpackningen på sval väl ventilerad plats åtskilt från cellulosa, S3/9/14/49.6

en: Store only in the original container in a cool well-ventilated place away from highly flammable substances, S3/9/14/49.7
de: Nur im Originalbehälter an einem kühlen\, gut gelüfteten Ort\, entfernt von leichtentzündlichen Stoffen aufbewahren, S3/9/14/49.7
dk: Må kun opbevares i originalemballagen på et køligt\, godt ventileret sted og på afstand fra brandfarlige stoffer, S3/9/14/49.7
es: Consérvese únicamente en el recipiente de origen\, en lugar fresco y bien ventilado y lejos de sustancias de fácil inflamación, S3/9/14/49.7
fi: Säilytettävä alkuperäispakkauksessa viileässä paikassa\, jossa on hyvä ilmanvaihto\, erillään helposti syttyvistä aineista, S3/9/14/49.7
fr: Conserver uniquement dans le récipient d'origine dans un endroit frais\, bien aéré et éloigné des substances facilement inflammables, S3/9/14/49.7
it: Conservare soltanto nel contenitore originale in luogo fresco\, ben ventilato\, lontano da sostanze facilmente infiammabili, S3/9/14/49.7
nl: Uitsluitend in het originele reservoir op een koele\, goed geventileerde plaats\, ontdaan van licht ontvlambare stoffen bewaren, S3/9/14/49.7
no: Må kun oppbevares i original emballasjen på et kjølig\, godt ventilert sted adskilt fra lett antennelige stoffer, S3/9/14/49.7
pt: Conservar unicamente no recipiente de origem em lugar fresco e bem ventilado ao abrigo de subtâncias facilmente inflamáveis, S3/9/14/49.7
sv: Förvaras i den ursprungliga förpackningen på sval väl ventilerad plats åtskilt från mycket brandfarliga ämnen, S3/9/14/49.7

en: Keep in a cool\, well-ventilated place away from acids, S3/9/14.1
de: An einem kühlen\, gut gelüfteten Ort\, entfernt von Säuren aufbewahren, S3/9/14.1
dk: Opbevares køligt\, godt ventileret og adskilt fra syrer, S3/9/14.1
es: Consérvese en lugar fresco y bien ventilado y lejos de ácidos, S3/9/14.1
fi: Säilytettävä viileässä paikassa\, jossa on hyvä ilmanvaihto\, erillään hapoista, S3/9/14.1
fr: Conserver dans un endroit frais et bien ventilé à l'écart des acides, S3/9/14.1
it: Conservare in luogo fresco e ben ventilato lontano da acidi, S3/9/14.1
nl: Bewaren op een koele\, goed geventileerde plaats verwijderd van zuren, S3/9/14.1
no: Oppbevares på et kjølig\, godt ventilert sted adskilt fra syre, S3/9/14.1
pt: Conservar em lugar fresco\, e bem ventilado ao abrigo de ácidos, S3/9/14.1
sv: Förvaras på sval väl ventilerad plats åtskilt från syror, S3/9/14.1

en: Keep in a cool\, well-ventilated place away from alkali, S3/9/14.2
de: An einem kühlen\, gut gelüfteten Ort\, entfernt von Laugen aufbewahren, S3/9/14.2
dk: Opbevares køligt\, godt ventileret og adskilt fra lud, S3/9/14.2
es: Consérvese en lugar fresco y bien ventilado y lejos de lejías, S3/9/14.2
fi: Säilytettävä viileässä paikassa\, jossa on hyvä ilmanvaihto\, erillään emäksistä, S3/9/14.2
fr: Conserver dans un endroit frais et bien ventilé à l'écart des lessives alcalines, S3/9/14.2
it: Conservare in luogo fresco e ben ventilato lontano da alcali, S3/9/14.2
nl: Bewaren op een koele\, goed geventileerde plaats verwijderd van logen, S3/9/14.2
no: Oppbevares på et kjølig\, godt ventilert sted adskilt fra lut, S3/9/14.2
pt: Conservar em lugar fresco\, e bem ventilado ao abrigo de lixívias, S3/9/14.2
sv: Förvaras på sval väl ventilerad plats åtskilt från baser, S3/9/14.2

en: Keep in a cool\, well-ventilated place away from metals, S3/9/14.3
de: An einem kühlen\, gut gelüfteten Ort\, entfernt von Metallen aufbewahren, S3/9/14.3
dk: Opbevares køligt\, godt ventileret og adskilt fra metaller, S3/9/14.3
es: Consérvese en lugar fresco y bien ventilado y lejos de metales, S3/9/14.3
fi: Säilytettävä viileässä paikassa\, jossa on hyvä ilmanvaihto\, erillään metalleista, S3/9/14.3
fr: Conserver dans un endroit frais et bien ventilé à l'écart des métaux, S3/9/14.3
it: Conservare in luogo fresco e ben ventilato lontano da metalli, S3/9/14.3
nl: Bewaren op een koele\, goed geventileerde plaats verwijderd van metalen, S3/9/14.3
no: Oppbevares på et kjølig\, godt ventilert sted adskilt fra metall, S3/9/14.3
pt: Conservar em lugar fresco\, e bem ventilado ao abrigo de metais, S3/9/14.3
sv: Förvaras på sval väl ventilerad plats åtskilt från metaller, S3/9/14.3

en: Keep in a cool\, well-ventilated place away from metal salts, S3/9/14.4
de: An einem kühlen\, gut gelüfteten Ort\, entfernt von Metallsalzen aufbewahren, S3/9/14.4
dk: Opbevares køligt\, godt ventileret og adskilt fra metalsalte, S3/9/14.4
es: Consérvese en lugar fresco y bien ventilado y lejos de sales metálicas, S3/9/14.4
fi: Säilytettävä viileässä paikassa\, jossa on hyvä ilmanvaihto\, erillään metallisuoloista, S3/9/14.4
fr: Conserver dans un endroit frais et bien ventilé à l'écart des sels métalliques, S3/9/14.4
it: Conservare in luogo fresco e ben ventilato lontano da sali metallici, S3/9/14.4
nl: Bewaren op een koele\, goed geventileerde plaats verwijderd van metaalzouten, S3/9/14.4
no: Oppbevares på et kjølig\, godt ventilert sted adskilt fra metalliske saltstoffer, S3/9/14.4
pt: Conservar em lugar fresco\, e bem ventilado ao abrigo de sais metálicos, S3/9/14.4
sv: Förvaras på sval väl ventilerad plats åtskilt från metallsalter, S3/9/14.4

en: Keep in a cool\, well-ventilated place away from iron\, water\, alkali, S3/9/14.5
de: An einem kühlen\, gut gelüfteten Ort\, entfernt von Eisen\, Wasser\, Lauge aufbewahren, S3/9/14.5
dk: Opbevares køligt\, godt ventileret og adskilt fra jern\, vand\, lud, S3/9/14.5
es: Consérvese en lugar fresco y bien ventilado y lejos de hierro\, acqua\, lejías, S3/9/14.5
fi: Säilytettävä viileässä paikassa\, jossa on hyvä ilmanvaihto\, erillään raudasta\, vedestä ja emäksistä, S3/9/14.5
fr: Conserver dans un endroit frais et bien ventilé à l'écart du fer\, de l'eau\, des lessives alcalines, S3/9/14.5
it: Conservare in luogo fresco e ben ventilato lontano da ferro\, acqua\, alcali, S3/9/14.5
nl: Bewaren op een koele\, goed geventileerde plaats verwijderd van ijzer\, water\, logen, S3/9/14.5
no: Oppbevares på et kjølig\, godt ventilert sted adskilt fra jern\, vann\, lut, S3/9/14.5
pt: Conservar em lugar fresco\, e bem ventilado ao abrigo de ferro\, áqua\, lixívias, S3/9/14.5
sv: Förvaras på sval väl ventilerad plats åtskilt från järn\, vatten\, baser, S3/9/14.5

en: Keep in a cool\, well-ventilated place away from cellulose, S3/9/14.6
de: An einem kühlen\, gut gelüfteten Ort\, entfernt von Cellulose aufbewahren, S3/9/14.6
dk: Opbevares køligt\, godt ventileret og adskilt fra cellose, S3/9/14.6
es: Consérvese en lugar fresco y bien ventilado y lejos de celulosa, S3/9/14.6
fi: Säilytettävä viileässä paikassa\, jossa on hyvä ilmanvaihto\, erillään selluloosasta, S3/9/14.6
fr: Conserver dans un endroit frais et bien ventilé à l'écart de cellulose, S3/9/14.6
it: Conservare in luogo fresco e ben ventilato lontano da cellulosa, S3/9/14.6
nl: Bewaren op een koele\, goed geventileerde plaats verwijderd van cellulose, S3/9/14.6
no: Oppbevares på et kjølig\, godt ventilert sted adskilt fra cellulose, S3/9/14.6
pt: Conservar em lugar fresco\, e bem ventilado ao abrigo de celulose, S3/9/14.6
sv: Förvaras på sval väl ventilerad plats åtskilt från cellulosa, S3/9/14.6

en: Keep in a cool\, well-ventilated place away from highly flammable substances, S3/9/14.7
de: An einem kühlen\, gut gelüfteten Ort\, entfernt von leichtentzündlichen Stoffen aufbewahren, S3/9/14.7
dk: Opbevares køligt\, godt ventileret og adskilt fra letantændelige stoffer, S3/9/14.7
es: Consérvese en lugar fresco y bien ventilado y lejos de sustancias fácilemente inflamables, S3/9/14.7
fi: Säilytettävä viileässä paikassa\, jossa on hyvä ilmanvaihto\, erillään helposti syttyvistä aineista, S3/9/14.7
fr: Conserver dans un endroit frais et bien ventilé à l'écart des matières facilement inflammables, S3/9/14.7
it: Conservare in luogo fresco e ben ventilato lontano da sostanzo facilmente infiammabili, S3/9/14.7
nl: Bewaren op een koele\, goed geventileerde plaats verwijderd van licht ontvlambare stoffen, S3/9/14.7
no: Oppbevares på et kjølig\, godt ventilert sted adskilt fralettantennelige stoffer, S3/9/14.7
pt: Conservar em lugar fresco\, e bem ventilado ao abrigo de matérias facilmente inflamáveis, S3/9/14.7
sv: Förvaras på sval väl ventilerad plats åtskilt från mycket brandfarliga ämnen, S3/9/14.7

en: Keep only in the original container in a cool\, well-ventilated place, S3/9/49
cs: Uchovávejte pouze v původním obalu na chladném\, dobře větraném místě, S3/9/49
de: Nur im Originalbehälter an einem kühlen\, gut gelüfteten Ort aufbewahren, S3/9/49
dk: Må kun opbevares i originalemballagen på et køligt\, godt ventileret sted, S3/9/49
el: ∆ιατηρείται µόνο µέσα στο αρχικό δοχείο σε δροσερό και καλά αεριζόµενο µέρος, S3/9/49
es: Consérvese únicamente en el recipiente de origen\, en lugar fresco y bien ventilado, S3/9/49
et: Hoida ainult originaalpakendis jahedas\, hästi ventileeritavas kohas, S3/9/49
fi: Säilytettävä alkuperäispakkauksessa viileässä paikassa\, jossa on hyvä ilmanvaihto, S3/9/49
fr: Conserver uniquement dans le récipient d'origine dans un endroit frais et bien ventilé, S3/9/49
hu: Hűvös\, jól szellőztetett helyen\, csak az eredeti edényzetben tárolható, S3/9/49
it: Conservare soltanto nel contenitore originale in luogo fresco e ben ventilato, S3/9/49
lt: Laikyti tik gamintojo pakuotėje\, vėsioje\, gerai vėdinamoje vietoje, S3/9/49
lv: Uzglabāt tikai originālajā iepakojumā vēsā\, labi vēdināmā vietā, S3/9/49
mt: Żomm biss fil-kontenitur oriġinali f'post frisk u vventilat tajjeb, S3/9/49
nl: Uitsluitend in de oorspronkelijke verpakking bewaren op een koele\, goed geventileerde plaats, S3/9/49
no: Må kun oppbevares i den originale emballasjen på et kjølig\, godt ventilert sted, S3/9/49
pl: Przechowywać wyłącznie w oryginalnym opakowaniu w chłodnym\, dobrze wentylowanym miejscu, S3/9/49
pt: Conservar unicamente no recipiente de origem\, em lugar fresco e bem ventilado, S3/9/49
sk: Uchovávajte len v pôvodnej nádobe na chladnom\, dobre vetranom mieste, S3/9/49
sl: Hraniti samo v izvirni posodi na hladnem in dobro prezračevanem mestu, S3/9/49
sv: Förvaras endast i originalförpackning på sval\, väl ventilerad plats, S3/9/49

en: Never add water to this product, S30
cs: K tomuto výrobku nikdy nepřidávejte vodu, S30
de: Niemals Wasser hinzugießen, S30
dk: Hæld aldrig vand på eller i produktet, S30
el: Ποτέ µην προσθέτετε νερό στο προϊόν αυτό, S30
es: No echar jamás agua a este producto, S30
et: Kemikaalile vett mitte lisada, S30
fi: Tuotteeseen ei saa lisätä vettä, S30
fr: Ne jamais verser de l'eau dans ce produit, S30
hu: Soha nem szabad vizet hozzáadni, S30
it: Non versare acqua sul prodotto, S30
lt: Niekada nemaišyti šios medžiagos su vandeniu, S30
lv: Stingri aizliegts pievienot ūdeni, S30
mt: Qatt titfa' ilma fuq dan il-prodott, S30
nl: Nooit water op deze stof gieten, S30
no: Vann må ikke tilsettes, S30
pl: Nigdy nie dodawać wody do tego produktu, S30
pt: Nunca adicionar água a este produto, S30
sk: Nikdy nepridávajte vodu k tomuto prípravku, S30
sl: Nikoli dolivati vode, S30
sv: Häll aldrig vatten på eller i produkten, S30

en: Take precautionary measures against static discharges, S33
cs: Proved’te preventivní opatření proti výbojům statické elektřiny, S33
de: Maßnahmen gegen elektrostatische Aufladungen treffen, S33
dk: Træf foranstaltninger mod statisk elektricitet, S33
el: Λάβετε προστατευτικά µέτρα έναντι ηλεκτροστατικών εκκενώσεων, S33
es: Evítese la acumulación de cargas electroestáticas, S33
et: Vältida staatilise elektri teket, S33
fi: Estettävä staattisen sähkön aiheuttama kipinöinti, S33
fr: Éviter l'accumulation de charges électrostatiques, S33
hu: A sztatikus feltöltődés ellen védekezni kell, S33
it: Evitare l'accumulo di cariche elettrostatiche, S33
lt: Imtis atsargumo priemonių elektrostatinėms iškrovoms išvengti, S33
lv: Veikt drošības pasākumus\, lai pasargātu no statiskās elektrības iedarbības, S33
mt: Evita l-kumulazzjoni ta' kargi elettrostatiċi, S33
nl: Maatregelen treffen tegen ontladingen van statische elektriciteit, S33
no: Ta forholdsregler mot statisk elektrisitet, S33
pl: Zastosować środki ostrożności zapobiegające wyładowaniom elektrostatycznym, S33
pt: Evitar acumulação de cargas electrostáticas, S33
sk: Vykonajte predbežné opatrenia proti statickým výbojom, S33
sl: Preprečiti statično naelektrenje, S33
sv: Vidtag åtgärder mot statisk elektricitet, S33

en: This material and its container must be disposed of in a safe way, S35
cs: Tento materiál a jeho obal musí bý t zneškodněny bezpečným způsobem, S35
de: Abfälle und Behälter müssen in gesicherter Weise beseitigt werden, S35
dk: Materialet og dets beholder skal bortskaffes på en sikker måde, S35
el: Το υλικό και ο περιέκτης του πρέπει να διατεθεί µε ασφαλή τρόπο, S35
es: Elimínense los residuos del producto y sus recipientes con todas las precauciones posibles, S35
et: Kemikaal ja pakend tuleb jäätmetena hävitada ohutult, S35
fi: Tämä aine ja sen pakkaus on hävittävä turvallisesti, S35
fr: Ne se débarrasser de ce produit et de son récipient qu'en prenant toutes précautions d'usage, S35
hu: Az anyagot és az edényzetét megfelelő módon ártalmatlanítani kell, S35
it: Non disfarsi del prodotto e del recipiente se non con le dovute precauzioni, S35
lt: Atliekos ir pakuotė turi būti saugiai pašalintos, S35
lv: Šo vielu vai produktu un iepakojumu likvidēt drošā veidā, S35
mt: Dan il-materjal u l-kontenitur tiegh-u għandhom jintremew bilprekawzjonijiet meħtieġa, S35
nl: Deze stof en de verpakking op veilige wijze afvoeren, S35
no: Produktet og emballasjen skal uskadeliggjøres på en sikker måte, S35
pl: Usuwać produkt i jego opakowanie w sposób bezpieczny, S35
pt: Não se desfazer deste produto e do seu recipiente sem tomar as precauções de segurança devidas, S35
sk: Tento materiál a jeho obal uložte na bezpečnom mieste, S35
sl: Vsebina in embalaža morata biti varno odstranjeni, S35
sv: Produkt och förpackning skall oskadliggöras på säkert sätt, S35

en: Wear suitable protective clothing, S36
cs: Používejte vhodný ochranný oděv, S36
de: Bei der Arbeit geeignete Schutzkleidung tragen, S36
dk: Brug særligt arbejdstøj, S36
el: Να φοράτε κατάλληλη προστατευτική ενδυµασία, S36
es: Úsese indumentaria protectora adecuada, S36
et: Kanda sobivat kaitseriietust, S36
fi: Käytettävä sopivaa suojavaatetusta, S36
fr: Porter un vêtement de protection approprié, S36
hu: Megfelelő védőruházatot kell viselni, S36
it: Usare indumenti protettivi adatti, S36
lt: Dėvėti tinkamus apsauginius drabužius, S36
lv: Izmantot piemērotu aizsargapgērbu, S36
mt: Ilbes ilbies protettiv adatt, S36
nl: Draag geschikte beschermende kleding, S36
no: Bruk egnede verneklær, S36
pl: Nosić odpowiednią odzież ochronną, S36
pt: Usar vestuário de protecção adequado, S36
sk: Noste vhodný ochranný odev, S36
sl: Nositi primerno zaščitno obleko, S36
sv: Använd lämpliga skyddskläder, S36

en: Wear suitable protective clothing and gloves, S36/37
cs: Používejte vhodný ochranný oděv a ochranné rukavice, S36/37
de: Bei der Arbeit geeignete Schutzhandschuhe und Schutzkleidung tragen, S36/37
dk: Brug særligt arbejdstøj og egnede beskyttelseshandsker, S36/37
el: Φοράτε κατάλληλη προστατευτική ενδυµασία και γάντια, S36/37
es: Úsense indumentaria y guantes de protección adecuados, S36/37
et: Kanda sobivat kaitseriietust ja –kindaid, S36/37
fi: Käytettävä sopivaa suojavaatusta ja suojakäsineitä, S36/37
fr: Porter un vêtement de protection et des gants appropriés, S36/37
hu: Megfelelő védőruházatot és védőkesztyűt kell viselni, S36/37
it: Usare indumenti protettivi e guanti adatti, S36/37
lt: Dėvėti tinkamus apsauginius drabužius ir mūvėti tinkamas pirštines, S36/37
lv: Izmantot piemērotu aizsargapgērbu un aizsargcimdus, S36/37
mt: Ilbes ilbies protettiv adatt u ingwanti, S36/37
nl: Draag geschikte handschoenen en beschermende kleding, S36/37
no: Bruk egnede verneklær og -hansker, S36/37
pl: Nosić odpowiednią odzież ochronną i odpowiednie rękawice ochronne, S36/37
pt: Usar vestuário de protecção e luvas adequadas, S36/37
sk: Noste vhodný ochranný odev a rukavice, S36/37
sl: Nositi primerno zaščitno obleko in zaščitne rokavice, S36/37
sv: Använd lämpliga skyddskläder och skyddshandskar, S36/37

en: Wear suitable protective clothing\, gloves and eye/face protection, S36/37/39
cs: Používejte vhodný ochranný oděv\, ochranné rukavice a ochranné brý le nebo obličejový štít, S36/37/39
de: Bei der Arbeit geeignete Schutzkleidung\, Schutzhandschuhe und Schutzbrille/Gesichtsschutz tragen, S36/37/39
dk: Brug særligt arbejdstøj\, egnede beskyttelseshandsker og -briller/ansigtsskærm, S36/37/39
el: Φοράτε κατάλληλη προστατευτική ενδυµασία\, γάντια και συσκευή προστασίας µατιών/προσώπου, S36/37/39
es: Úsense indumentaria y guantes adecuados y protección para los ojos/la cara, S36/37/39
et: Kanda sobivat kaitseriietust\, -kindaid ja silmade või näokaitset, S36/37/39
fi: Käytettävä sopivia suojavaatetusta\, suojakäsineitä ja silmien- tai kasvonsuojainta, S36/37/39
fr: Porter un vêtement de protection approprié\, des gants et un appareil de protection des yeux/du visage, S36/37/39
hu: Megfelelő védőruházatot\, védőkesztyűt és szem-/arcvédőt kell viselni, S36/37/39
it: Usare indumenti protettivi e guanti adatti e proteggersi gli occhi/la faccia, S36/37/39
lt: Dėvėti tinkamus apsauginius drabužius\, mūvėti tinkamas pirštines ir naudoti akių (veido) apsaugos priemones, S36/37/39
lv: Izmantot piemērotu aizsargapgērbu\, aizsargcimdus un acu vai sejas aizsargu, S36/37/39
mt: Ilbes ilbies protettiv adatt\, ingwanti u protezzjoni għall-ghajnejn/ wiċċ, S36/37/39
nl: Draag geschikte beschermende kleding\, handschoenen en een beschermingsmiddel voor de ogen/het gezicht, S36/37/39
no: Bruk egnede verneklær\, -hansker og -briller/ansikts- sjerm, S36/37/39
pl: Nosić odpowiednią odzież ochronną\, odpowiednie rękawice ochronne i okulary lub ochronę twarzy, S36/37/39
pt: Usar vestuário de protecção\, luvas e equipamento protector para os oloos/face adequados, S36/37/39
sk: Noste vhodný ochranný odev a ochranné prostriedky na oči/ tvár, S36/37/39
sl: Nositi primerno zaščitno obleko\, zaščitne rokavice in zaščito za oči/obraz, S36/37/39
sv: Använd lämpliga skyddskläder\, skyddshandskar samt skyddsglasögon eller ansiktsskydd, S36/37/39

en: Wear suitable protective clothing and eye/face protection, S36/39
cs: Používejte vhodný ochranný oděv a ochranné brý le nebo obličejový štít, S36/39
de: Bei der Arbeit geeignete Schutzkleidung und Schutzbrille/Gesichtsschutz tragen, S36/39
dk: Brug særligt arbejdstøj og egnede beskyttelsesbriller/ansigtsskærm, S36/39
el: Φοράτε κατάλληλη προστατευτική ενδυµασία και συσκευή προστα- σίας µατιών / προσώπου, S36/39
es: Úsense indumentaria adecuada y protección para los ojos/la cara, S36/39
et: Kanda sobivat kaitseriietust ja silmade või näokaitset, S36/39
fi: Käytettävä sopivia suojavaatetusta ja silmien- tai kasvonsuojainta, S36/39
fr: Porter un vêtement de protection approprié et un appareil de protection des yeux/du visage, S36/39
hu: Megfelelő védőruházatot és arc-/szemvédőt kell viselni, S36/39
it: Usare indumenti protettivi adatti e proteggersi gli occhi/la faccia, S36/39
lt: Dėvėti tinkamus apsauginius drabužius ir naudoti akių (veido) apsaugos priemones, S36/39
lv: Izmantot piemērotu aizsargapgērbu un acu vai sejas aizsargu, S36/39
mt: Ilbes ilbies protettiv adatt u protezzjoni għall-għajnejn/wiċċ, S36/39
nl: Draag geschikte beschermende kleding en een beschermingsmiddel voor de ogen/het gezicht, S36/39
no: Bruk egnede verneklær\, og -briller/ansikts- sjerm, S36/39
pl: Nosić odpowiednią odzież ochronną i okulary lub ochronę twarzy, S36/39
pt: Usar vestuário de protecção e equipamento protector para os olhos/face adequados, S36/39
sk: Noste vhodný ochranný odev a ochranné prostriedky na oči/ tvár, S36/39
sl: Nositi primerno zaščitno obleko in zaščito za oči/obraz, S36/39
sv: Använd lämpliga skyddskläder samt skyddsglasögon eller ansiktsskydd, S36/39

en: Wear suitable gloves, S37
cs: Používejte vhodné ochranné rukavice, S37
de: Geeignete Schutzhandschuhe tragen, S37
dk: Brug egnede beskyttelseshandsker under arbejdet, S37
el: Να φοράτε κατάλληλα γάντια, S37
es: Úsese guantes adecuados, S37
et: Kanda sobivaid kaitsekindaid, S37
fi: Käytettävä sopivia suojakäsineitä, S37
fr: Porter des gants appropriés, S37
hu: Megfelelő védőkesztyűt kell viselni, S37
it: Usare guanti adatti, S37
lt: Mūvėti tinkamas pirštines, S37
lv: Strādāt aizsargcimdos, S37
mt: Ilbes ingwanti adatt, S37
nl: Draag geschikte handschoenen, S37
no: Bruk egnede vernehansker, S37
pl: Nosić odpowiednie rękawice ochronne, S37
pt: Usar luvas adequadas, S37
sk: Noste vhodné rukavice, S37
sl: Nositi primerne zaščitne rokavice, S37
sv: Använd lämpliga skyddshandskar, S37

en: Wear suitable gloves and eye/face protection, S37/39
cs: Používejte vhodné ochranné rukavice a ochranné brý le nebo obličejový štít, S37/39
de: Bei der Arbeit geeignete Schutzhandschuhe und Schutzbrille/Gesichtsschutz tragen, S37/39
dk: Brug egnede beskyttelseshandsker og -briller/ansigtsskærm under arbejdet, S37/39
el: Φοράτε κατάλληλα γάντια και συσκευή προστασίας µατιών/προσώ- που, S37/39
es: Úsense guantes adecuados y protección para los ojos/la cara, S37/39
et: Kanda sobivaid kaitsekindaid ja silmade või näokaitset, S37/39
fi: Käytettävä sopivia suojakäsineitä ja silmien- tai kasvonsuojainta, S37/39
fr: Porter des gants appropriés et un appareil de protection des yeux/du visage, S37/39
hu: Megfelelő védőkesztyűt és szem-/arcvédőt kell viselni, S37/39
it: Usare guanti adatti e proteggersi gli occhi/la faccia, S37/39
lt: Mūvėti tinkamas pirštines ir naudoti akių (veido) apsaugos priemones, S37/39
lv: Izmantot aizsargcimdus un acu vai sejas aizsargu, S37/39
mt: Ilbes ingwanti adattati u protezzjoni għall-għajnejn/wiċċ, S37/39
nl: Draag geschikte handschoenen en een beschermingsmiddel voor de ogen/het gezicht, S37/39
no: Bruk egnede vernehansker og -briller/ansikts- sjerm, S37/39
pl: Nosić odpowiednie rękawice ochronne I okulary lub ochronę twarzy, S37/39
pt: Usar luvas e equipamento protector para os olhos/face adequados, S37/39
sk: Noste vhodné rukavice a ochranné prostriedky na oči a tvár, S37/39
sl: Nositi primerne zaščitne rokavice in zaščito za oči/obraz, S37/39
sv: Använd lämpliga skyddshandskar samt skyddsglasögon eller ansiktsskydd, S37/39

en: In case of insufficient ventilation\, wear suitable respiratory equipment, S38
cs: V případě nedostatečného větrání používejte vhodné vybavení pro ochranu dýchacích orgánů, S38
de: Bei unzureichender Belüftung Atemschutzgerät anlegen, S38
dk: Brug egnet åndedrætsværn\, hvis effektiv ventilation ikke er mulig, S38
el: Σε περίπτωση ανεπαρκούς αερισµού\, χρησιµοποιείτε κατάλληλη αναπνευστική συσκευή, S38
es: En caso de ventilación insuficiente\, úsese equipo respiratorio adecuado, S38
et: Ebapiisava ventilatsiooni korral kanda sobivat hingamisteede kaitsevahendit, S38
fi: Kemikaalin käyttö edellyttää tehokasta ilmanvaihtoa tai sopivaa hengityksenuojainta, S38
fr: En cas de ventilation insuffisante\, porter un appareil respiratoire approprié, S38
hu: Ha a szellőzés elégtelen\, megfelelő légzőkészüléket kell használni, S38
it: In caso di ventilazione insufficiente\, usare un apparecchio respiratorio adatto, S38
lt: Esant nepakankamam vėdinimui\, naudoti tinkamas kvėpavimo takų apsaugos priemones, S38
lv: Nepietiekamas ventilācijas apstākļos aizsargāt elpošanas orgānus, S38
mt: F'każ ta' nuqqas ta' ventilazzjoni biżżejjed\, ilbes apparat respiratorju adatt, S38
nl: Bij ontoereikende ventilatie een geschikte adembescherming dragen, S38
no: Hvis effektiv ventilasjon ikke er mulig\, må det brukes egnet ånderettsvern, S38
pl: W przypadku niedostatecznej wentylacji stosować odpowiednie indywidualne środki ochrony dróg oddechowych, S38
pt: Em caso de ventilação insuficiente\, usar equipamento respiratório adequado, S38
sk: V prípade nedostatočného vetrania použite vhodný respirátor, S38
sl: Ob nezadostnem prezračevanju nositi primerno dihalno opremo, S38
sv: Använd lämpligt andningsskydd vid otillräcklig ventilation, S38